West Virginia, session 2025, HB3515.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WEST VIRGINIA STATE POLICE. §15-2-4. Appointment of commissioned officers, noncommissioned officers, other members; temporary and permanent positions. (a) The superintendent shall appoint, from the enlisted membership of the State Police, a deputy superintendent who shall hold the rank of lieutenant colonel and be next in authority to the superintendent. The superintendent shall appoint, from the enlisted membership of the State Police, the number of other officers and members he or she considers necessary to operate and maintain the executive offices, training school and forensic laboratory; and to keep records relating to crimes and criminals, coordinate traffic safety activities, maintain a system of supplies and accounting and perform other necessary services.(b) The ranks within the membership of the State Police shall be colonel, lieutenant colonel, major, captain, first lieutenant, second lieutenant, first sergeant, sergeant, corporal, trooper first class, senior trooper, trooper or cadet trooper. Each member while in uniform shall wear the insignia of rank as provided by law and written State Police policies. Members assigned to the forensic laboratory shall hold the title of trooper, be classified as criminalists and wear the insignia of classification as provided by written State Police policies.The superintendent may appoint from the membership of the State Police 20 principal supervisors who shall receive the compensation and hold the temporary rank of lieutenant colonel, major or captain at the will and pleasure of the superintendent. The superintendent may also appoint from the membership of the executive protection section of the State Police two additional supervisors who shall receive the compensation and hold the temporary rank of first lieutenant and serve at the will and pleasure of the superintendent. Appointments are exempt from any eligibility requirements established by the career progression system: Provided, That any member appointed from within the executive protection section of the State Police to the temporary rank of first lieutenant must have completed a minimum of two years service within the executive protection section prior to becoming eligible for such appointment. Any person appointed to a temporary rank under the provisions of this article remains eligible for promotion or reclassification under the provisions of the career progression system if his or her permanent rank is below that of first lieutenant. Upon the termination of a temporary appointment by the superintendent, the member may not be reduced to a rank or classification below his or her permanent rank or classification, unless the reduction results from disciplinary action, and remains eligible for subsequent appointment to a temporary rank.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home